Utah statutes.
70A-3-107.   Instrument payable in foreign money.
Unless the instrument otherwise provides, an instrument that states the amount
payable in foreign money may be paid in the foreign money or in an equivalent
amount in dollars calculated by using the current bank-offered spot rate at
the place of payment for the purchase of dollars on the day on which the
instrument is paid.
